Utah statutes.
63B-9-102.   State Building Ownership Authority revenue bond authorizations.
(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership
Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building
Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations, or enter into or
arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be
created, to provide up to $10,500,000 for the construction of a multipurpose
building for the state fair park, together with additional amounts necessary
to:
(a)  pay costs of issuance;
(b)  pay capitalized interest; and
(c)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(2)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the
board of directors of the Utah State Fair Corporation to seek out the most
effective and prudent lease purchase plan available.
